trunk/morphology/analyzer_xfst/quechua-web.xfst
# set char-encoding utf-8
# -*- encoding: utf-8 -*-

       #derivation boundary
       define DB [[ "[" "^DB" "]"] :0];
       define removeDB ["" <- "[" "^DB" "]"];

      #Morpheme-Boundary
       define MB [[ "[""--""]"] :0];

       #-------------------------------#
       # Delete all flag on both sides #
       #-------------------------------#
       define Cleanup1 [["@MU"|"@PU"|"@KU"|"@YSI"|"@RI"|"@MPA"|"@CHI"|"@RQU"|"@MI"|"@SI"|"@CHA"|"@Vdim"|"@YKU"|"@YU"|"@PTI"|"@STI"|"@PA"|"@TA"|"@AS"|"@ALLI"|"@HATU"|"@POSS"|"@POSSni"|"+ku+"|"+yku+"|"+yu+"|"+rqu+"|"+ru+"|"+pu+"|"+mu+"|%["CARD"%]|"+nn"|"@PLYUQ"|"@NAWPA"|"@CHIQA"|"@YANA"] -> ""];
       define Cleanup2 ["" <- ["@MU"|"@PU"|"@KU"|"@YSI"|"@MPA"|"@RI"|"@CHI"|"@RQU"|"@MI"|"@SI"|"@CHA"|"@Vdim"|"@YKU"|"@YU"|"@PTI"|"@STI"|"@PA"|"@TA"|"@AS"|"@ALLI"|"@HATU"|"@POSS"|"@POSSni"|"+ku+"|"+yku+"|"+yu+"|"+rqu+"|"+ru+"|"+pu+"|"+mu+"|"+nn"|"@NAWPA"|"@CHIQA"|"@YANA"] ];

############################################################################### 

          #########################
          #                       #
          # PHONETIC VARIATIONS   #
          #                       #
          #########################

      define Vowel [a|e|i|o|u|á|é|í|ó|ú|A|E|I|O|U|Á|É|Í|Ó|Ú|"@TA"|{pa}"@PA"|"@PTI"|"@STI"];
      define Cons [b|c|d|f|g|h|j|k|l|m|n|ñ|p|q|r|s|t|v|w|y|z|'|{m}"@MU"|{m}"@MI"|{s}"@SI"|{ch}"@CHA"|{ntin}"@NTIN"|{p}"@PA"|{q}"@PA"];

      #--------------------------#
      # allow uppercase letters  #
      #--------------------------#

      define LowerCase [A (->) a, B (->) b, C (->) c,D (->) d,E (->) e,F (->) f,G (->) g,H (->) h,I (->) i,J (->) j,K (->) k,L (->) l,M (->) m,N (->) n,O (->) o,P (->) p,Q (->) q,R (->) r,S (->) s,T (->) t,U (->) u,V (->) v,W (->) w,X (->) x,Y (->) y,Z (->) z,Ñ (->) ñ];

      define UpperCase [ a (->) A,b (->) B,c (->) C,d (->) D,e (->) E,f (->) F,g (->) G,h (->) H,i (->) I,j (->) J,k (->) K,l (->) L,m (->) M,n (->) N,o (->) O,p (->) P,q (->) Q,r (->) R,s (->) S,t (->) T,u (->) U,v (->) V,w (->) W,x (->) X,y (->) Y,z (->) Z,ñ (->) Ñ];


      #-------------------------------------------------------------------#
      # Ersetze optional u durch o und i durch e, falls in Umgebung von q #
      #-------------------------------------------------------------------#

      define Allophone1 [ u (->) o||  _ (s|t|n|r|l) q, q (s|t|n|r|h|l|') _  , _ (s|t|n|r|l){cc}, {cc}(s|t|n|r|h|l|') _ ] .o. [i (->) e || _ (s|t|n|r|h|l) q, q (s|t|n|r|l|ll|h|') _ , _ (s|t|n|r|h|l){cc}, {cc}(s|t|n|r|l|ll|') _  ];

      #define Allophone2 [ m (->) n || _ p];
      define Allophone2 [ m (->) n || \"@MPA" _ p ];
      define Allophone3 [ {ll} (->) l || _ q];

      define Allophone [Allophone1 .o. Allophone2 .o. Allophone3] ;

       #---------------------------#
       # alternative orthographies #
       #---------------------------#

       define Orthography1 [ {q} (->) {cc}];
       define Orthography2 [ {wi} (->) {hui}];
       define Orthography3 [ {wa} (->) {hua}];
       define Orthography4 [ {w} (->) {u} || {a}_ ];
       define Orthography5 [ {h} (->) {j}];
       define Orthography6 [ {ch} (->) {ts}];
       
       define Orthography [Orthography1 .o. Orthography2 .o. Orthography3 .o. Orthography4 .o. Orthography5 .o.  Orthography6];

       define QuechuaOrtho Allophone .o. Orthography;

       # apply after Cleanup
       define Accent1 [ a (->) á, u (->) ú ||  _ [w|y] .#.];
       define Accent2 [ {qa} (->) {qá}, {taq} (->) {táq}, {ri} (->) {rí}|| _  .#.];
       define Accent Accent1 .o. Accent2;
       
       #-------------------------------------------------#
       # Orthography of Spanish loan words:              #
       #                                                 #
       #- may be written with or without their accents   #
       #- e may be written as i, o as u in Spanish words #
       #-------------------------------------------------#
       define AccentES [ á (->) a,é (->) [e|i],í (->) i, ó (->) [o|u],ú (->) u, ü (->) u];
       define AccentES2 [ a (->) á,e (->) é, i (->) í,o (->) ó, u (->) ú, u (->) ü ];
       define spanLetras [ e (->) i, i (->) e, o (->) u, u (->) o, c (->) k , d (->) t, g (->)j, w  (->) o, b (->) p, v (->) w, z (->) s , j (->) h];
       define SpanOrtho AccentES .o. AccentES2 .o. spanLetras;

########################################################################
########################################################################
##                                                                    ##
##               MORPHOPHONOLOGICAL RULES                             ##
##                                                                    ##
########################################################################
########################################################################

      ###########
      # NOMINAL #
      ###########

      #-----------------------------------------------------#
      # Possessive -nkuna -> ambiguous: -n-kuna or nku-kuna #
      #-----------------------------------------------------#

       define 3PossPl  [ {nku} %["NPers"%] %["+3.Pl.Poss"%] (<-) n %["NPers"%] %["+3.Sg.Poss"%] \\  _ %["--"%]{kuna}%["Num"%] ];


       #----------------------------------------------------#
       # Possessive -ykuna -> ambiguous: y-kuna or yku-kuna #
       #----------------------------------------------------#

       define 2PossPl [ {yku} %["NPers"%] %["+1.Pl.Excl.Poss"%] (<-) y %["NPers"%] %["+1.Sg.Poss"%] \\  _ %["--"%]{kuna}%["Num"%] ];

       define PossessivPlural [3PossPl .o. 2PossPl];

       #------------------------------------------------------------#
       # Genitive -pa after Konsonant, -q/-p after Vowel (optional) #
       #------------------------------------------------------------#
      # define GENITIV [ {pa}"@PA" (->) [{p}|{q}]"@PA"  ||Vowel  _ ];
	define PA1 [  {q}"@PA"  => Vowel _  ];
	define PA2 [  {p}"@PA"  => Vowel _  ];
	#define PA3 [  {pa}"@PA" => Cons _  ];
      define GENITIV PA1 .o. PA2 ;

       #--------------------------------------------------------#
       # Possessive forms need euphon. -ni/-ñi after Consonants #
       #--------------------------------------------------------#

        #define POSSESSIV1 [ {@POSS} -> [{ni}|{ñi}]  || Cons _ ];
        #define POSSESSIV2 [ {@POSS} ->  "" || Vowel _ ];
	#define POSSESSIV POSSESSIV1 .o. POSSESSIV2;

	define POSS1 [ "@POSS"  => Vowel _  ];
	define POSS2 [ "@POSSni" => Cons _  ];

      define POSSESSIV POSS1 .o. POSS2;

       define NounRules GENITIV .o. POSSESSIV;

       ##########
       # VERBAL #
       ##########

       #--------------------------------------------------------#
       # CONTEXT RESTRICTIONS:                                  #
       # na as +Rzpr has be followed by ku, chi or spa          #
       # mu shortened to 'n' is only allowed preceding pu       #
       #--------------------------------------------------------#
       define naRzpr [  "+Rzpr"  => _ ?* ["+Rflx_Int"|"+Caus"|"+SS"] ];
       #define mpuDIR3 [ "+nn+" =>   _ ?* "@PU" ];

       #-----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       # if in lower side {rqu} as {rqa}, {pu} as {pa} etc. -> we want those forms to appear on the upper side as well               #
       # (otherwise rqa/pa would appear as rqu/pu in the output, which would be wrong given the morphological context of these forms #
       #-----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#

       define rqurqa5 [ {rqa}"+rqu+" <- {rqu}"+rqu+" \\ _ ?* ["@MU"|"@PU"|"@YSI"|"@CHI"|"@RI"]];
       define rqurqa6 [ {ra}"+ru+" <- {ru}"+ru+" \\ _ ?* ["@MU"|"@PU"|"@YSI"|"@CHI"|"@RI"]];
       define ykuyka3 [ {yka}"+yku+" <- {yku}"+yku+" \\ _   ?* ["@MU"|"@PU"|"@YSI"|"@CHI"|"@RI"|"@Vdim"|"+Rzpr"]];
       define ykuyka4 [ {ya}"+yu+" <- {yu}"+yu+" \\ _ ?* ["@MU"|"@PU"|"@YSI"|"@CHI"|"@RI"|"@Vdim"|"+Rzpr"]];
       define mpuDIR2 [ {m}"+mu+" <- {mu}"+mu+"  \\  _ ?* "@PU" ];

       define pupa2 [ {pa}"+pu+" <- {pu}"+pu+" \\  _  ?* ["@KU"|"@MU"] ];
       define kuka2 [ {ka}"+ku+" <- {ku}"+ku+" \\  _  ?* ["@MU"|"@CHI"|"@PU"|"+Rzpr"] ];

      define VerbRulesUpper  naRzpr  .o. rqurqa5 .o. rqurqa6 .o. ykuyka3 .o. ykuyka4 .o. mpuDIR2  .o. pupa2 .o. kuka2;

       #-------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       # rqu --> rqa before mu, pu , ri ,ysi (rqa can only be +Rptn in this position, everywhere   #
       # else, it's supposed to be NPst                                                            #
       #-------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       define rqurqa1 [ {rqu}"@RQU"-> {rqa}"@RQU"  || _  ?* ["@MU"|"@PU"|"@YSI"|"@CHI"|"@RI"]];
       define rqurqa2 [ {ru}"@RQU"-> {ra}"@RQU" || _ ?* ["@MU"|"@PU"|"@YSI"|"@CHI"|"@RI"]];
       define rqurqa3 [ {rqu}"@RQU" (->) {rqa}"@RQU"  || _  ?* "@KU"];
       define rqurqa4 [ {ru}"@RQU" (->) {ra}"@RQU" || _ ?* "@KU"];      

       #--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       # -yku becomes -yka before -mu, -pu, -ysi, -chi, -ri, -cha                             #
       # and -na. Seems not always to be the case, therefore, this rule is optional (->)      #
       #--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       define ykuyka1 [ {yku}"@YKU" (->) {yka}"@YKU" || _   ?* ["@MU"|"@PU"|"@YSI"|"@CHI"|"@RI"|"+Rzpr"]];
       define ykuyka2 [ {yu}"@YKU" (->) {ya}"@YKU" || _ ?* ["@MU"|"@PU"|"@YSI"|"@CHI"|"@RI"|"+Rzpr"]];

       #--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       # -mu translocative --> as -m only before pu (might otherwise be confused wth -mpa, positional, -mpu can be written as npu #
       #--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       define mpuDIR [ {mu}"@MU" -> {m}"@MU"  ||  _ ?* "@PU" ];

       #----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       # pu regressive --> pa only before ku and mu (might otherwise be confused with -pa repetitive) #
       #----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       define pupa [ {pu}"@PU" -> {pa}"@PU" ||  _  ?* ["@KU"|"@MU"] ];

       #-----------------------------------------------------------------------#
       # ku reflexive --> ka before chi and mu and pu (possibley before na (?) #
       #-----------------------------------------------------------------------#
       define kuka [ {ku}"@KU" -> {ka}"@KU" ||  _  ?* ["@MU"|"@CHI"|"@PU"|"+Rzpr"] ];



   define VerbRulesLower rqurqa1 .o. rqurqa2  .o. rqurqa3 .o. rqurqa4 .o. ykuyka1 .o. ykuyka2 .o. mpuDIR .o. pupa .o. kuka;


       ##############
       # AMBIVALENT #
       ##############

       #--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       # evidential suffixes mi,si,cha as -m,-s,-ch only after vowel. Apply rule to complete word form, after cleanup #
       # of flags, otherwise the context might not be right                                                           #
       #--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#

       #define EVID1 [ {mi}"@MI" -> [{m}|{n}]"@MI"  ||Vowel  _ ];
       #define EVID2 [ {si}"@SI" -> {s}"@SIu" || Vowel  _ ];
       #define EVID3 [ {chi}"@CHA" -> {ch}"@CHA" || Vowel  _ ];
       #define EVID4 [ {cha}"@CHA" -> {ch}"@CHA" || Vowel  _ ];

	define SI1 [  {s}"@SI"  => Vowel _  ];
	define SI2 [  {si}"@SI" => Cons _  ];

	define MI1 [  {m}"@MI"  => Vowel _  ];
	define MI2 [  {n}"@MI"  => Vowel _  ];
	define MI3 [  {mi}"@MI" => Cons _  ];
